Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1657.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 25, chapter 11, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 25-1502, to read: START_STATUTE25-1502. Domestic relations proceedings; attorney fees In any proceeding brought pursuant to this title, if the court enters an award of attorney fees, the court shall order that the total award of attorney fees be paid from the community assets of the parties.  If there are no community assets, the court may not assess attorney fees against a party in an amount that exceeds fifteen percent of that party's disposable income or $8,000, whichever is greater.END_STATUTE